Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-534
Class I, II, or III school district; board of education.

All Class I, II, or III school districts shall be under the direction and control of the boards of education elected pursuant to section 32-543.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision XIV, § 2, p. 378;

Laws 1899, c. 62, § 6, p. 292;

Laws 1901, c. 63, § 7, p. 439;

R.S.1913, § 6949;

C.S.1922, § 6583;

C.S.1929, § 79-2502;

R.S.1943, § 79-2502;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 233, p. 768;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 21;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 16;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 600;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-802;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 287;

Laws 2000, LB 1243, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 41.
July 19, 2024
For qualifications of members of board of education, see section 79-543.

Vacancies, see section 79-545.